Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2508.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 7715. Exemption of records from access.(a) Right-to-Know Law.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), records of a volunteer EMS company, volunteer fire company or volunteer rescue company shall be exempt from access under the provisions of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(2) Records or parts of records that are directly associated with funding or resources provided by a local municipality under the following shall be subject to access 123456789101112131415161718 under the Right-to-Know Law:(i) Section 1553 of the act of May 1, 1933 (P.L.103, No.69), known as The Second Class Township Code.(ii) 8 Pa.C.S. § 1202(56) (relating to specific powers).(iii) 11 Pa.C.S. § 12446 (relating to emergency services).(iv) 73 Pa.C.S. § 4359 (relating to emergency services).(b) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Volunteer EMS company." As defined in section 7802 (relating to definitions)."Volunteer fire company." As defined in section 7802."Volunteer rescue company." As defined in section 7802.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2508PN3395 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617